Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1370XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1370XD (5) 91
cm/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
DIVISION I
JUDICIAL OFFICER RESIDENCY
Section 1. Section 602.6201, subsection 2, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
2. A district judge must be a resident of the judicial
election district or a resident of a county contiguous with the
judicial election district in which appointed before assuming
office and must be a resident of the judicial election district
during the entire term of office. Subject to the provision
for reassignment of judges under section 602.6108, a district
judge shall serve in the district of the judge’s residence
appointment while in office, regardless of the number of
judgeships to which the district is entitled under the formula
prescribed by the supreme court in subsection 3.
Sec. 2. Section 602.6305, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2025,
are amended to read as follows:
1. District associate judges shall serve initial terms
and shall stand for retention in office within the judicial
election districts of their residences appointment at the
judicial election under sections 46.16 through 46.24.
3. A district associate judge must be a resident of the
judicial election district or a resident of a county contiguous
with the judicial election district in which the office is held
before assuming office and during the entire term of office.
A district associate judge shall serve within the judicial
district in which appointed, as directed by the chief judge,
and is subject to reassignment under section 602.6108.
Sec. 3. Section 602.6404, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. A magistrate shall be a resident of the county of
appointment judicial election district or a resident of
a county contiguous to the county of appointment judicial
election district in which appointed during the magistrate’s
term of office. A magistrate shall serve within the judicial
district in which appointed, as directed by the chief judge,
LSB 1370XD (5) 91
-1- cm/ns 1/8

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
provided that the chief judge may assign a magistrate to hold
court outside of the county or counties of appointment for the
orderly administration of justice. A magistrate is subject to
reassignment under section 602.6108.
Sec. 4. Section 602.7103C, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2025,
are amended to read as follows:
1. Full-time associate juvenile judges shall serve terms
and shall stand for retention in office within the judicial
election districts of their residences appointment as provided
under sections 46.16 through 46.24.
3. A full-time associate juvenile judge must be a resident
of the judicial election district or a resident of a county
contiguous with the judicial election district in which the
office is held before assuming office and during the entire
term of office. A full-time associate juvenile judge shall
serve within the judicial district in which appointed, as
directed by the chief judge, and is subject to reassignment
under section 602.6108.
Sec. 5. Section 633.20C, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2025, are
amended to read as follows:
1. Full-time associate probate judges shall serve terms
and shall stand for retention in office within the judicial
election districts of their residences appointment as provided
under sections 46.16 through 46.24.
3. A full-time associate probate judge must be a resident
of the judicial election district or a resident of a county
contiguous with the judicial election district in which the
office is held before assuming office and during the entire
term of office. A full-time associate probate judge shall
serve within the judicial district in which appointed, as
directed by the chief judge, and is subject to reassignment
under section 602.6108.
Sec. 6. REPEAL. Section 602.11110, Code 2025, is repealed.
DIVISION II
MISCELLANEOUS JUDICIAL ADMINISTRATION
LSB 1370XD (5) 91
-2- cm/ns 2/8

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Sec. 7. Section 602.1612, subsection 4, Code 2025, is
amended by striking the subsection.
Sec. 8. Section 602.3201, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
602.3201 Requirement of certification —— use of title.
A person shall not engage in the profession of shorthand
reporting unless the person is certified pursuant to this
chapter, or otherwise exempted pursuant to section 602.6603,
subsection 4 3. Only a person who is certified by the board
may assume the title of certified shorthand reporter, or use
the abbreviation C.S.R., or any words, letters, or figures to
indicate that the person is a certified shorthand reporter.
Sec. 9. Section 602.6105, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. Courts shall be held at the places in each county
maintaining space for the district court as designated by the
chief judge of the judicial district, or held by remote means
of communication, except that the determination of actions,
special proceedings, and other matters not requiring a jury may
be done at some other place in the district with the consent of
the parties. For the purposes of this subsection, contiguous
counties which have entered into an agreement to share costs
pursuant to section 331.381, subsection 16, paragraph “b”,
shall be considered as one unit for the purpose of conducting
all matters except as otherwise provided in this subsection.
Sec. 10. Section 602.6603, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
602.6603 Court reporters.
1. a. Each district judge shall appoint a The chief judge
of a judicial district or the chief judge’s designee shall have
the authority to supervise, schedule, and assign duties to all
court reporters in the judicial district.
b. Notwithstanding paragraph “a”, a judge presiding over a
proceeding that must be reported shall have the authority to
supervise the work of a court reporter while the court reporter
LSB 1370XD (5) 91
-3- cm/ns 3/8

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
is actively engaged in reporting that proceeding.
c. The chief judge of a judicial district may delegate the
authority set forth in paragraph “a” to the district court
administrator or the district court administrator’s designee.
2. The judicial officers of a judicial district shall
appoint a court reporter, subject to approval of the chief
judge of the judicial district or the chief judge’s designee.
A court reporter may be assigned to a district judge or the
district associate judge subject to subsection 1. A court
reporter who shall, upon the request of a party in a civil or
criminal case, report the evidence and proceedings in the case,
and perform all duties as provided by law.
2. Each district associate judge may appoint a court
reporter, subject to the approval of the chief judge of the
judicial district.
3. If a chief judge of a judicial district determines that
it is necessary to employ an additional court reporter because
of an extraordinary volume of work, or because of the temporary
illness or incapacity of a regular court reporter, the chief
judge may appoint a temporary court reporter who shall serve
as required by the chief judge.
4. 3. If a regularly appointed court reporter becomes
disabled, or if a vacancy occurs in a regularly appointed
court reporter position, the chief judge or the chief
judge’s designee may appoint a competent, uncertified
shorthand reporter for a period of time of up to one year,
upon verification by the chief judge that a diligent but
unsuccessful search has been conducted to appoint a certified
shorthand reporter to the position and, in a disability case,
that the regularly appointed court reporter is disabled.
An uncertified shorthand reporter shall not be reappointed
to the position unless the reporter becomes a certified
shorthand reporter within the period of appointment under this
subsection.
5. 4. Except as provided in subsection 4 3, a person
LSB 1370XD (5) 91
-4- cm/ns 4/8

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
shall not be appointed to the position of court reporter of
the district court unless the person has been certified as a
shorthand reporter by the board of examiners under article 3.
6. 5. Each court reporter shall take an oath faithfully
to perform the duties of office, which shall be filed in the
office of the clerk of district court.
7. 6. A court reporter may be removed for cause with
due process by the judicial officer officers making the
appointment, subject to the approval of the chief judge or the
chief judge’s designee.
8. 7. If a judge dies, resigns, retires, is removed
from office, becomes disabled, or fails to be retained in
office and the judicial vacancy is eligible to be filled, the
court reporter appointed by the judge shall serve as a court
reporter, as directed by the chief judge or the chief judge’s
designee, until the successor judge appoints a successor court
reporter. The court reporter shall receive the reporter’s
regular salary and benefits during the period of time until a
successor court reporter is appointed or until the currently
appointed court reporter is reappointed.
Sec. 11. Section 602.8102, subsection 9, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
9. Enter in the appearance docket a memorandum of the date
of filing of all petitions, demurrers, answers, motions, or
papers of any other description in the cause. A pleading of
any description is considered filed when the clerk entered
the date the pleading was received on the pleading and the
pleading shall not be taken from the clerk’s office until the
memorandum is made. The memorandum shall be made within two
business days of a new petition or order being filed, and as
soon as practicable for all other pleadings. Thereafter, when
a demurrer or motion is sustained or overruled, a pleading is
made or amended, or the trial of the cause, rendition of the
verdict, entry of judgment, issuance of execution, or any other
act is done in the progress of the cause, a similar memorandum
LSB 1370XD (5) 91
-5- cm/ns 5/8

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
shall be made of the action, including the date of action and
the number of the book and page of the record where the entry is
made. The appearance docket is an index of each suit from its
commencement to its conclusion.
Sec. 12. Section 602.9206, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. Section 602.1612 does not apply to a senior judge but
does apply to a retired senior judge. During the tenure of
a senior judge, if the judge is able to serve, the judge
may be assigned by the supreme court to temporary judicial
duties on courts of this state without salary for an aggregate
of thirteen weeks out of each twelve-month period, and for
additional weeks with the judge’s consent. A senior judge
shall not be assigned to judicial duties on the supreme
court unless the judge has been appointed to serve on the
supreme court prior to retirement. While serving on temporary
assignment, a senior judge has and may exercise all of the
authority of the office to which the judge is assigned, shall
continue to be paid the judge’s annuity as senior judge, shall
be reimbursed for the judge’s actual expenses to the extent
expenses of a district judge are reimbursable under section
602.1509, may, if permitted by the assignment order, appoint a
temporary court reporter, who shall be paid the remuneration
and reimbursement for actual expenses provided by law for a
reporter in the court to which the senior judge is assigned,
and, if assigned to the court of appeals or the supreme court,
shall be given the assistance of a law clerk and a secretary
designated by the court administrator of the judicial branch
from the court administrator’s staff. Each order of temporary
assignment shall be filed with the clerks of court at the
places where the senior judge is to serve.